src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-81tegemae_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - tegemä: # Verb (81) tegemä 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     tegemä+V+Inf/mA: tegemä
     tegemä+V+Inf: tetäq
     tegemä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: tennüq
     tegemä+V+Pss+PrfPrc: tett

     tegemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tii
     tegemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: tiit
     tegemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tege
     tegemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: teemiq
     tegemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: tiitiq
     tegemä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tegeväq
     tegemä+V+Act+Ind+ConNeg: tiiq
     tegemä+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: tii
     tegemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tei
     tegemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: teit
     tegemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tekḱ
     tegemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: teimiq
     tegemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: teitiq
     tegemä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: teiq

     tegemä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tetä
     tegemä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tetäs

     tegemä+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: tettäv

     tegemä+V+Jus: tekuq
